Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8021. LAKEWAY MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT

Sec. 8021.0001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of directors of the district.

(2) "District" means the Lakeway Municipal Utility District, Travis County.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 8021.0002. EXCLUSION OF LAND. (a) The board may, at its discretion, call a hearing to consider excluding land from the district or determine not to call a hearing to exclude land from the district.

(b) If the board holds a hearing under Subsection (a), the board may by order exclude land from the district on any of the grounds for exclusion provided by Section 49.306, Water Code, provided that:

(1) the board receives a petition, signed by the owners of the land to be excluded and consented to by all lienholders, requesting exclusion of the land as described by metes and bounds; and

(2) the owners of the land pay to the district a payment and any other fees or costs required by the district.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 8021.0003. NOTICE OF HEARING. (a) Except as provided by Section 8021.0004, in addition to the notice required by Section 49.304, Water Code, the district shall, not later than the 30th day before the date of the exclusion hearing under Section 8021.0002(a):

(1) publish notice of the exclusion hearing in a nationally recognized financial journal; and

(2) mail notice of the exclusion hearing by certified mail to the paying agent or registrar of the district's outstanding bonds.

(b) The notice required by Subsection (a) must advise any district bondholder, taxpayer, or other interested party that the person may appear at the exclusion hearing in support of or in opposition to the petition for exclusion.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 8021.0004. EXCLUSION WITH BOND REFUNDING. (a) Land may be excluded as authorized by this chapter in conjunction with a refunding of the district's outstanding bonds.

(b) If land is excluded in the manner provided by Subsection (a), the only notice required is the notice specified by Section 49.304, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2021.

Sec. 8021.0005. APPLICABILITY OF CERTAIN OTHER LAW. Sections 49.307 and 49.308, Water Code, apply to an exclusion of land carried out under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2021.